Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1751.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; REPORT REQUIRED.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities to provide hospital, medical, and dental benefits coverage to part-time or adjunct faculty who teach six or more credits in an academic year and currently are not offered hospital, medical, and dental benefits. This appropriation is also to collect data on participation that will allow for a more accurate estimate of the cost of this coverage on an ongoing basis. This is a onetime appropriation. The Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities must submit a report with collected data on participation and estimates of the cost for ongoing coverage to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over higher education by November 1, 2027. new text end